Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.145

Entrepreneurial assistance—Recipients of temporary assistance for needy families—Cooperation with agencies for training and industrial recruitment.

(1) The department shall ensure that none of its rules or practices act to exclude recipients of temporary assistance for needy families from any small business loan opportunities or entrepreneurial assistance it makes available through its community development block grant program or otherwise provides using state or federal resources. The department shall encourage local administrators of microlending programs using public funds to conduct outreach activities to encourage recipients of temporary assistance for needy families to explore self-employment as an option. The department shall compile information on private and public sources of entrepreneurial assistance and loans for start-up businesses and provide the department of social and health services with the information for dissemination to recipients of temporary assistance for needy families.

(2) The department shall, as part of its industrial recruitment efforts, work with the workforce training and education coordinating board to identify the skill sets needed by companies locating in the state. The department shall provide the department of social and health services with the information about the companies' needs in order that recipients of public assistance and service providers assisting such recipients through training and placement programs may be informed and respond accordingly. The department shall work with the state board for community and technical colleges, the job skills program, the employment security department, and other employment and training programs to facilitate the inclusion of recipients of temporary assistance for needy families in relevant training that would make them good employees for recruited firms.

(3) The department shall perform the duties under this section within available funds.

[ 1997 c 58 s 323.]

NOTES:

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.